Utah statutes.
67-19-6.3.   Equal employment opportunity plan.

(1)  In conjunction with the director's duties under Section 67-19-6, and notwithstanding the general prohibition in Subsection 34A-5-106(3)(c), the executive director shall prepare an equal employment opportunity plan for state employment consistent with the guidelines provided in  federal equal employment opportunity laws and in related federal regulations.

(2)  The equal employment opportunity plan required by this section applies only to state career service employees described in Section 67-19-15.

(3)  The Legislature shall review the equal employment opportunity plan required by this section before it may be implemented.

(4)  Nothing in this section requires the establishment of hiring quotas or preferential treatment of any identifiable group.

